apertium-deu-nld.nld.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>

    <sdef n="aff"     c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="int"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn"      c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>    
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinate conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c=" conjuntion"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"  c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>    
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"     c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l/><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e><re>¿</re><p><l/><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l><r/></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



 <!-- Naamwoorden -->
 <pardef n="kind__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eren</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="herfst__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="vrede__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="autoba/an__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nen</l>
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="na/am__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>men</l>
        <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

<pardef n="pa/ar__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ar</l>
        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ren</l>
        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>


 <pardef n="meisje__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="zin__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nen</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="boek__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>


 <pardef n="succes__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sen</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="schaapskop__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>pen</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="klootzak__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ken</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
 </pardef>

 <pardef n="abriko/os__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zen</l>
        <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="bana/an__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nen</l>
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="pe/er__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ren</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="aardbei__n">
   <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="boek"><i>boek</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beeld"><i>beeld</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geschenk"><i>geschenk</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dier"><i>dier</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ontbijt"><i>ontbijt</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kind"><i>kind</i><par n="kind__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naam"><i>na</i><par n="na/am__n"/></e>
    <e lm="water"><i>water</i><par n="herfst__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leeftijd"><i>leeftijd</i><par n="aardbei__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eind"><i>eind</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dorp"><i>dorp</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="woord"><i>woord</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moment"><i>moment</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seizoen"><i>seizoen</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="land"><i>land</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gebied"><i>gebied</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="succes"><i>succes</i><par n="succes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paar"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mens"><i>mens</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="onderzoek"><i>onderzoek</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voorbeeld"><i>voorbeeld</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eiland"><i>eiland</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feit"><i>feit</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="punt"><i>punt</i><par n="boek__n"/></e>
                                  <e><par n="coma"/></e>
                                  <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
                                  <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
                                  <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
                                  <e><par n="separ"/></e>
                                  <e><par n="separa"/></e>
